Mississippi, session 2026, HB1171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  As used in this act, the following terms have the meanings as defined in this section, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Grant" or "grant award" means an award of financial assistance from a state agency to an eligible nongovernmental organization after an application process for a specified project-based purpose, excluding: (i)  Any financial assistance provided to state or local government entities; (ii)  Entitlement programs such as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF); (iii)  Individual benefit programs; and (iv)  Formula-based funding allocations not requiring competitive application processes. (b)  "Pass-through entity" means a recipient or subrecipient that provides a subaward to a subrecipient, including lower tier subrecipients, to carry out part of a grant program.  The authority of the pass-through entity under this act flows through the subaward agreement between the pass-through entity and subrecipient. (c)  "Primary recipient" means a nongovernmental organization receiving grant funds directly from a state agency. (d) "Subaward" means an award provided by a pass-through entity to a subrecipient for the subrecipient to contribute to the goals and objectives of the project by carrying out part of a grant award received by the pass-through entity.  It does not include payments to a contractor, beneficiary or participant. (e) "Subrecipient" means a nongovernmental organization that receives a subaward from a pass-through entity to carry out part of a grant award.  The term subrecipient does not include a beneficiary or participant.  A subrecipient may also be a recipient of other awards directly from a state agency.  Any vendor providing a final good or service to the primary recipient for the purposes of satisfying the objective(s) of the grant is not a subrecipient under this act. SECTION 2. (1)  All state agencies that administer grants shall establish specific, measurable quarterly and annual objectives and outcomes relating to the purpose of the grant. (2)  Where appropriate, grant programs shall include long-term performance objectives for at least five (5) years into the future. (3)  Primary recipients shall submit quarterly summary progress reports demonstrating advancement toward the stated objectives of the grant program.  Quarterly progress reports need not provide all details required in annual reports. (4)  Failure to meet reporting requirements or established metrics shall result in: (a)  Immediate suspension of grant payments pending corrective action; (b)  Agency review for potential grant termination; and (c)  Termination of the grant award if metrics remain unmet in two (2) consecutive quarters. SECTION 3. (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall establish a schedule for periodic review of all grant programs administered by state agencies. (2)  Each state agency shall conduct comprehensive reviews of its existing grant programs every five (5) years, except for grant programs not expected to last for more than two (2) years. (3)  State agencies shall submit recommendations to the Department of Finance and Administration regarding continuation, modification or termination of reviewed grant programs at the conclusion of their comprehensive reviews as set forth in this section. SECTION 4. (1)  State agencies shall establish objective criteria for grant eligibility. (2)  No preference shall be given based on: (a)  Political affiliation; (b)  Ideological orientation; (c)  Prior receipt of grant funds, except with respect to documented violations of the prohibited activities outlined in Section 5 of this act; or (d)  Organization type or tax status, unless specifically required by law. (3)  Grant eligibility shall not be restricted based on organization type or tax status unless: (a)  Explicitly required by law; or (b)  Determined necessary based on documented programmatic requirements. SECTION 5. Grant funds shall not be used by any primary recipient or subrecipient for voter registration or get-out-the-vote campaigns. (a)  If the violating entity is the primary recipient, a violation of this section shall result in the immediate termination of the grant and a five-year debarment from receiving grant funds, including grant subawards. (b)  If the violating entity is a subrecipient, a violation of this section shall result in the immediate termination of the subaward and a five-year debarment from receiving grant funds, including grant subawards. (c)  Any violations committed by subrecipients shall be recorded on the compliance record of all pass-through entities and shall result in a five-year debarment for the offending subrecipient from receiving grants and cause the immediate termination of all grant funds.  The full value of the subaward granted to the offending subrecipient by the pass-through entity or entities shall be counted towards the total value of prohibited spending by for all pass-through entities. (d)  If the total value of spending prohibited by this section committed by a pass-through entity's subrecipients exceeds one-tenth of one percent (0.1%) of that entity's total grant receipts, including subawards, for the five (5) preceding fiscal years, then the pass-through entity shall face: (i)  The immediate termination of all current grant awards; and (ii)  Five-year debarment from receiving grant funds. (e)  Any primary recipient or subrecipient of grant funds that engages in voter registration or get-out-the-vote activities must prove that no grant funds were used, directly or indirectly, to support such activities to avoid the sanctions enumerated by this section. SECTION 6. Each state agency shall maintain a public website displaying: (a)  All active grants; (b)  Award amounts; (c)  Primary recipient information; (d)  Quarterly financial and performance reports; (e)  Final evaluation reports; and (f)  A complete list of all subrecipients, including the: (i)  Entity name and contact information; (ii)  Amount received; (iii)  Purpose of the subaward; and (iv)  Performance metrics and outcomes. Information shall be updated within fourteen (14) days of any change or new report. SECTION 7. (1)  Primary recipients shall submit detailed quarterly financial reports including: (a)  Summary expenditures; (b)  Administrative costs; (c)  Direct service expenses; (d)  Supporting documentation for all expenses exceeding Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00); (e)  A complete accounting of all funds redistributed to subrecipients; and (f)  The purpose for all funds redistributed to subrecipients. (2)  All reports shall be publicly accessible through the agency's official website.  The reports shall redact all personal and medical information and similar materials that would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy if disclosed. (3)  The Department of Finance and Administration, in coordination with the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, shall develop and implement an automated data processing tool for use by primary recipients and subrecipients to standardize, organize and format all financial information required under this section.  The processing tool shall convert submitted information into a consistent, machine-readable format. (4)  Primary recipients and subrecipients shall publish all required financial information from the preceding fiscal year no later than January 1 of each calendar year. SECTION 8. (1)  Any nongovernmental organization applying for grant funding shall require all executive officers and members of its governing board to submit a signed disclosure statement that includes: (a)  Whether such individual currently serves in any professional capacity with decision-making authority regarding grant appropriations; (b)  Whether such individual has, within the preceding five (5) years, served as an executive officer or member of the governing board for a nongovernmental organization at a time when that organization violated the standards of Section 5 of this act; and (c)  Whether such individual has any criminal convictions for offenses related to bribery, corruption, fraud or other financial or legal crimes, including the nature, jurisdiction and disposition date of any such conviction. (2)  The disclosure statements required by this section shall be: (a)  Submitted with the initial grant application; (b)  Updated within thirty (30) days of any change in leadership of the organization or relevant circumstances; (c)  Made publicly available on the awarding agency's official website within fourteen (14) days of receipt; and (d)  Certified as true and complete under penalty of perjury. (3)  Any nongovernmental organization found to contain leadership that meets the criteria in subsection (1) of this section is disqualified and shall immediately become ineligible to receive grant funds, including grant subawards, for such duration as any disqualified individual holds a position as an executive officer or member of the governing board at the organization.  Eligibility shall be considered immediately restored upon affirmation signed by the organization's governing board and executive officers under threat of perjury that no disqualified individuals retain leadership positions at the time of the attestation. (4)  Any nongovernmental organization found to contain leadership disqualified by subsection (1) of this section shall: (a)  Face the immediate suspension of all active grants; and (b)  Receive electronic notice from the relevant agency of the necessary conditions to restore grant eligibility. (5)  Any grant payments suspended under this section shall be disbursed to the offending nongovernmental organization as long as the organization restores its eligibility within thirty (30) days of electronic notice as provided in subsection (4) of this section; however, if the organization does not restore its eligibility within thirty (30) days, any grant payments missed during the period of suspension are considered forfeit. SECTION 9. (1)  The Department of Finance and Administration shall: (a)  Issue guidance to state agencies that administer grant programs to implement this act by November 1, 2026; (b)  Establish standards for grant performance metrics across all state agencies; and (c)  Coordinate with state agencies to ensure consistent implementation of the requirements of this act. (2)  State agencies shall: (a)  Update grant policies and procedures in accordance with this act by January 1, 2027; (b)  Establish monitoring protocols to ensure compliance; and (c)  Report annually to the Department of Finance and Administration on implementation progress. SECTION 10. (1)  Every primary recipient and subrecipient shall undergo an annual compliance audit by or under the direction of the Office of the State Auditor pursuant to Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards (GAGAS).  The State Auditor may apply risk-based scoping and materiality and may integrate this work with any required federal single audit. (2)  The audit shall include, at a minimum: (a)  Schedule of expenditures of state funds for each payment, including the date, amount, description/object code, vendor/payee legal name and persistent Vendor ID, Voucher ID, Contract/Award ID, PO/Release (if applicable), fund and program/appropriation code; (b)  Schedule of revenues by source, including state-tax-derived funds, other state funds, federal funds, local funds and/or private funds; (c)  Subrecipient schedule, including the entity name, EIN/SOS ID, amount, purpose, award/subaward ID and dates; (d)  Related-party transactions and conflict-of-interest disclosures; and (e)  Findings with severity, questioned costs, criteria/condition/cause/effect, and a Corrective Action Plan (CAP) with responsible official and timeline. (2)  Auditees shall provide full access to books and records, including bank statements, contracts and amendments, payroll registers, invoices, and subawards.  All required schedules shall be delivered in machine-readable formats (CSV/JSON; Parquet as appropriate) using the join-key fields.  The auditee's schedules and CAP shall be certified under penalty of perjury by an authorized officer. (3)  The State Auditor shall publish the report, management letter and CAP on Transparency Mississippi and transmit them to the Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House, and committee chairs of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency Committees of the House and Senate.  The report shall identify any payments that appear to diverge from the auditee's stated purposes or the objectives of the grant program. (4)  Reports under this section are due within one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of the fiscal year, and records shall be retained for seven (7) years. (5)  Failure to submit, material noncooperation or obstruction may result in the suspension of any payments, ineligibility for new awards and/or the recoupment of grant funds, and the State Auditor may refer the matter to the Attorney General. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.